Hawaii statutes.
[§11-431] Payment to candidate. (a)
Upon the commission's approval of the application and statement of qualifying
contributions, the commission shall direct the comptroller to distribute
matching public funds up to the maximum amount of public funds allowed by
section 11-425. Public funds shall be distributed to the candidate within
twenty days from the date that the candidate's initial application and
qualifying contribution statement is approved by the commission.

(b) The commission shall make additional
determinations within fourteen days after receiving a complete application and
supplemental statement of qualifying contributions from a candidate.

(c) All determinations made by the commission
under this section are final and conclusive, except to the extent they are
subject to examination and audit by the commission under section 11-434. [L
2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next